Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201568-1111
Act, how cited.

Sections 68-1111 to 68-1119 shall be known and may be cited as the Aging and Disability Resource Center Demonstration Project Act.

Laws 2015, LB320, § 1.
August 30, 2015